nb: Sertifikat personlig tilpasningstype: Tom (til å skrive på); Redigerbar digital mal; Inngravert / foliestemplet personlig tilpasning; Utfyllbar PDF-mal; Personlig trykk (navn/dato); Forhåndstrykt (fast tekst); Utskriftsvennlig (kunden skriver ut); Annet
sv: Typ av certifikatanpassning: Tom (att fylla i); Redigerbar digital mall; Graverad/foliepräglad personanpassning; Ifyllbar PDF-mall; Personligt tryck (namn/datum); Förtryckt (fast text); Utskrivbar (kunden skriver ut); Övrigt
es: Tipo de personalización del certificado: En blanco (para escribir); Plantilla digital editable; Personalización grabada/estampada en aluminio; Plantilla PDF rellenable; Impresión personalizada (nombre/fecha); Preimpresa (texto fijo); Imprimible (impresión por el cliente); Otra
sk-SK: Typ personalizácie certifikátu: Prázdne (na vypísanie); Upraviteľná digitálna šablóna; Gravírovaná/vyrazená personalizácia; Vyplniteľná šablóna PDF; Personalizovaná potlač (meno/dátum); Predtlačené (fixný text); Na vytlačenie (zákazník si vytlačí); Iné
vi: Loại cá nhân hóa chứng nhận: Trống (tự điền); Mẫu kỹ thuật số có thể chỉnh sửa; Cá nhân hóa chạm khắc/ép kim; Mẫu PDF có thể điền; In cá nhân hóa (tên/ngày); In sẵn (văn bản cố định); Có thể in (khách hàng tự in); Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de personalização do certificado: Em branco (para escrever); Modelo digital editável; Personalização gravada/com estampagem; Modelo de PDF preenchível; Impressão personalizada (nome/data); Pré-impresso (texto fixo); Para impressão (impressão do cliente); Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta personalizacije certifikata: Prazno (za upisivanje); Digitalni predložak koji se može uređivati; Gravirana / foliotiskana personalizacija; PDF predložak za ispunjavanje; Personalizirani ispis (ime/datum); Unaprijed ispisano (fiksni tekst); Za ispis (ispisuje korisnik); Ostalo
de: Personalisierungsart des Zertifikats: Blanko (zum Beschriften); Bearbeitbare digitale Vorlage; Gravierte/Foliengeprägte Personalisierung; Ausfüllbare PDF-Vorlage; Personalisierter Druck (Name/Datum); Vorgedruckt (fester Text); Druckbar (zum Selbstdruck); Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul de personalizare a certificatului: Gol (de completat); Șablon digital editabil; Personalizare gravată/cu folie; Șablon PDF completabil; Imprimare personalizată (nume/dată); Pretipărit (text fix); Printabil (printează clientul); Altele
el: Τύπος εξατομίκευσης πιστοποιητικού: Κενό (συμπλήρωση με το χέρι); Επεξεργάσιμο ψηφιακό πρότυπο; Εξατομίκευση με χάραξη/θερμοτυπία; Συμπληρώσιμο πρότυπο PDF; Εξατομικευμένη εκτύπωση (όνομα/ημερομηνία); Προεκτυπωμένο (σταθερό κείμενο); Εκτυπώσιμο (εκτύπωση από τον πελάτη); Άλλο
fi: Sertifikaatin personointitapa: Tyhjä (kirjoitettava); Muokattava digitaalinen malli; Kaiverrettu/foliopainettu personointi; Täytettävä PDF-malli; Personoitu painatus (nimi/päivämäärä); Esipainettu (kiinteä teksti); Tulostettava (asiakas tulostaa); Muu
pl: Typ personalizacji certyfikatu: Pusty (do wpisania); Edytowalny szablon cyfrowy; Personalizacja grawerowana / tłoczona folią; Szablon PDF do wypełnienia; Wydruk spersonalizowany (imię i nazwisko / data); Z nadrukiem (stały tekst); Do druku (drukuje klient); Inne
bg-BG: Тип персонализация на сертификата: Празна (за попълване на ръка); Редактируем дигитален шаблон; Персонализиране с гравиране/печат с фолио; PDF шаблон за попълване; Персонализиран печат (име/дата); Предварително отпечатана (фиксиран текст); За печат (отпечатва се от клиента); Други
nl: Certificaat personalisatietype: Blanco (zelf invullen); Bewerkbare digitale template; Gegraveerde/gefoliede personalisatie; Invulbare pdf-template; Gepersonaliseerde print (naam/datum); Voorgedrukt (vaste tekst); Afdrukbaar (klant drukt af); Overig
ko: 증서 개인화 유형: 빈칸(수기 입력); 편집 가능한 디지털 템플릿; 각인/박 찍기 개인화; 채울 수 있는 PDF 템플릿; 개인화 인쇄(이름/날짜); 사전 인쇄(고정 텍스트); 인쇄 가능(고객 인쇄); 기타
th: ประเภทการปรับแต่งใบรับรอง: เว้นว่าง (ให้เขียน); เทมเพลตดิจิทัลที่แก้ไขได้; การปรับให้เหมาะกับแต่ละบุคคลด้วยการสลัก/ปั๊มฟอยล์; เทมเพลต PDF แบบกรอกได้; พิมพ์แบบปรับให้เหมาะกับแต่ละบุคคล (ชื่อ/วันที่); พิมพ์ล่วงหน้า (ข้อความตายตัว); พิมพ์ได้ (ลูกค้าพิมพ์เอง); อื่นๆ
hu: Tanúsítvány személyre szabásának típusa: Üres (kézzel kitölthető); Szerkeszthető digitális sablon; Gravírozott / Fóliázott személyre szabás; Kitölthető PDF-sablon; Személyre szabott nyomtatás (név/dátum); Előre nyomtatott (fix szöveg); Nyomtatható (a vásárló nyomtatja ki); Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta prilagajanja certifikata: Prazno (za vpis); Uredljiva digitalna predloga; Gravirana/zlatotiskana personalizacija; Izpolnljiva predloga PDF; Personaliziran tisk (ime/datum); Vnaprej natisnjeno (nespremenljivo besedilo); Za tiskanje (stranka natisne sama); Drugo
da: Type af personalisering på certifikat: Tom (til at skrive på); Redigerbar digital skabelon; Indgraveret/folietrykt personlig tilpasning; Udfyldelig PDF-skabelon; Personligt tryk (navn/dato); Fortrykt (fast tekst); Printbar (kunden udskriver selv); Andet
cs: Typ personalizace certifikátu: Prázdné (k dopsání); Upravitelná digitální šablona; Gravírovaná personalizace / personalizace ražbou fólií; Vyplnitelná PDF šablona; Personalizovaný tisk (jméno/datum); Předtištěné (pevný text); K tisku (tiskne zákazník); Jiná
zh-CN: 证书个性化类型: 留白（手写）; 可编辑数字模板; 雕刻/烫箔个性化; 可填写的 PDF 模板; 个性化印刷（姓名/日期）; 预印（固定文本）; 可打印（客户打印）; 其他
ja: 証明書パーソナライゼーションタイプ: 空白 (手書き); 編集可能なデジタルテンプレート; 刻印/箔押しによる名入れ; 入力可能なPDFテンプレート; カスタム印刷 (名前/日付); 印刷済み (固定テキスト); 印刷可能 (お客様自身で印刷); その他
tr: Sertifika kişiselleştirme tipi: Boş (elle yazılan); Düzenlenebilir dijital şablon; Oyulmuş/folyo baskılı kişiselleştirme; Doldurulabilir PDF şablonu; Kişiselleştirilmiş baskı (ad/tarih); Önceden basılmış (sabit metin); Yazdırılabilir (müşteri yazdırır); Diğer
ru: Тип персонализации сертификата: Пустой (для заполнения вручную); Редактируемый цифровой шаблон; Гравировка / тиснение фольгой; Заполняемый PDF-шаблон; Персонализированная печать (имя/дата); С готовой печатью (фиксированный текст); Для печати (печатает клиент); Другое
zh-TW: 證書個人化類型: 空白 (可填寫); 可編輯數位範本; 雕刻/燙金個人化; 可填寫式 PDF 範本; 個人化列印 (姓名/日期); 預先印製 (固定文字); 可列印 (顧客自行列印); 其他
fr: Type de personnalisation du certificat: Vierge (à remplir); Modèle numérique modifiable; Personnalisation gravée/estampée à la feuille; Modèle PDF à remplir; Impression personnalisée (nom/date); Préimprimé (texte fixe); Imprimable (le client imprime); Autre
it: Tipo di personalizzazione del certificato: Vuoto (da scrivere); Modello digitale modificabile; Personalizzazione incisa/stampata a caldo; Modello PDF compilabile; Stampa personalizzata (nome/data); Prestampato (testo fisso); Stampabile (stampa a cura del cliente); Altro
lt-LT: Sertifikato individualizavimo tipas: Tuščias (įrašoma ranka); Redaguojamas skaitmeninis šablonas; Išgraviruotas / folija įspaustas asmeninis pritaikymas; Užpildomas PDF šablonas; Asmeniškai pritaikyta spauda (vardas / data); Iš anksto atspausdinta (fiksuotas tekstas); Spausdinama (atspausdina klientas); Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de personalização do certificado: Em branco (para escrever); Modelo digital editável; Personalização gravada/com estampagem foil; Modelo de PDF preenchível; Impressão personalizada (nome/data); Pré-impresso (texto fixo); Imprimível (cliente imprime); Outro
en: Certificate personalization type: Blank (write-in); Editable digital template; Engraved/foil-stamped personalization; Fillable PDF template; Personalized print (name/date); Pre-printed (fixed text); Printable (customer prints); Other